Utah statutes.
73-3-6.   Publication of notice of application -- Corrections or amendments
of applications.
(1) (a)  When an application is filed in compliance with this title, the state
engineer shall publish a notice of the application:
(i)  once a week for a period of two successive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the source of supply is located,
and where the water is to be used; and
(ii)  in accordance within Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.
(b)  The notice shall:
(i)  state that an application has been made; and
(ii)  specify where the interested party may obtain additional information
relating to the application.
(c)  Clerical errors, ambiguities, and mistakes that do not prejudice the
rights of others may be corrected by order of the state engineer either before
or after the publication of notice.
(2)  After publication of notice to water users, the state engineer may
authorize amendments or corrections that involve a change of point of
diversion, place, or purpose of use of water, only after republication of
notice to water users.
